Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB902.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 61.691 to the contrary and
subject to the limitations established by this section, recipients of a monthly retirement
allowance from the Kentucky Employees Retirement System or State Police Retirement
System who have been retired for at least 12 months shall receive a one-time
supplemental payment added to their July 2026 retirement allowance payment, equal to
the monthly retirement allowance the recipient receives from the system in the month of
June 2026, not to exceed a maximum payment per recipient of $1,000.
Section 2. There is hereby appropriated General Fund moneys in the amount of
$43,827,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 from the budget reserve trust fund account
established by KRS 48.705 to the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority to be applied to
the following funds to prefund the supplemental payment provided by Section 1 of this
Act:
(1) $38,488,000 to the Kentucky Employees Retirement Fund of the Kentucky
Employees Retirement System established by KRS 61.515 to prefund the supplemental
payment from the Kentucky Employees Retirement System to each recipient for service
in a nonhazardous position as defined in KRS 61.510(44);
(2) $3,748,000 to the Kentucky Employees Retirement Fund of the Kentucky
Employees Retirement System established by KRS 61.515 to prefund the supplemental
payment from the Kentucky Employees Retirement System to each recipient for service
in a hazardous position as provided in KRS 61.592; and
(3) $1,591,000 to the State Police Retirement Fund of the State Police Retirement
System established by KRS 16.510 to prefund the supplemental payment from the State
Police Retirement System to each recipient.
Section 3. Whereas retired members and beneficiaries of the Kentucky
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:51 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2453
Employees Retirement System and State Police Retirement System have not received a
cost-of-living adjustment to their retirement allowances since fiscal year 2011-2012, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by
the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 3/3/2026 4:51 PM Jacketed